New York, session 2025-2026, S8311.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public housing law is amended by adding a new section 2 402-h to read as follows: 3 § 402-h. Succession rights. 1. The policies and procedures of the New 4 York city housing authority include, and shall continue to include, 5 policies and procedures allowing individuals to claim succession rights 6 to public housing units in properties owned and operated by the New York 7 city housing authority upon the permanent departure or death of the 8 tenant of record from the unit. 9 2. The New York city housing authority shall establish written poli- 10 cies and procedures for asserting succession rights consistent with the 11 requirements of applicable federal, state, and local laws, regulations, 12 and guidance, as they may change from time to time. Such written poli- 13 cies and procedures shall also be consistent with the New York city 14 housing authority's occupancy standards. Such policies and procedures 15 shall include, but not be limited to: 16 (a) eligibility requirements for lease succession; 17 (b) relocation requirements, if any, arising out of lease succession; 18 (c) the requirement to pay use and occupancy during the pendency of 19 succession rights proceedings; and 20 (d) the right to an administrative grievance of the New York city 21 housing authority's denial of succession rights, except as limited by 22 the New York city housing authority's succession rights policies and 23 procedures. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13001-10-5 S. 8311--A 2 1 3. The New York city housing authority shall issue notice in writing 2 of substantive changes to its succession rights policies and procedures 3 at least thirty days prior to implementing those changes, and shall 4 afford an opportunity to provide written comments with respect to the 5 proposed changes. The New York city housing authority shall consider 6 written comments prior to implementation of the proposed changes. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.